Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1797.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SOMALI MUSEUM OF MINNESOTA.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the Somali Museum of Minnesota for the heritage arts and cultural vitality programs to provide classes, exhibits, and presentations; for outreach about the Somali community and heritage in Minnesota; to increase hours of operation; and to provide free and reduced-fee programming for schools and community events. new text end